Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,108.01
Land Surveyors Regulation Act; act, how cited.

Sections 81-8,108 to 81-8,127 shall be known and may be cited as the Land Surveyors Regulation Act.

Laws 2015, LB138, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 17.
September 1, 2024